Louisiana, session 2026, HB788.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 2(C) of Act No. 446 of the 2024 Regular Session of the
Legislature is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 2.
* * *
(C) At no time shall a property owner in the district be subject to an annual
parcel fee, whether paid to the district or to the parish on behalf of the district or
both, that exceeds the rate limits provided in R.S. 33:9097.4(F)(1) R.S.
33:9097.7(F)(1) as amended by this Act.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-116 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 788
Section 2. R.S. 33:9097.7(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§9097.7. Melrose East Crime Prevention District
* * *
B.(1) Boundaries. The district shall encompass the area included within the
following perimeter: Renoir Avenue, North Ardenwood Drive, North Lobdell
Boulevard, and Florida Boulevard (north side).
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the
boundaries of the district shall also encompass the area included on both sides of the
following streets: Renoir Avenue, North Ardenwood Drive, and North Lobdell
Boulevard, and Florida Boulevard if the question of expansion and imposition of the
parcel fee is approved by a majority of the registered voters in the area included
within the expanded boundaries voting on a proposition at an election held for that
purpose in accordance with the Louisiana Election Code. No less than thirty days
prior to any election held to approve such expansion and parcel fee, the board shall
mail notification of the upcoming election to each registered voter of the expanded
area and to each owner of a parcel in the expanded area who is not a registered voter
of the expanded area.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.